California, session 20252026 Special Session 1, SB3.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 2240-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 2240-001-0001—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 43,120,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 3,879,000 (2) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 8,109,000 (3) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 31,132,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount available in Schedule (3), $1,440,000 shall be made available for payment of legal services provided by the Department of Justice. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule 3, $2,400,000 is for the California Surplus Land Unit pursuant to Section 54902 of the Health and Safety Code. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $4,000,000 shall be awarded to the City of Los Angeles, the County of Los Angeles, the City of Malibu, the City of Pasadena, and other local governments, if needed, to provide additional planning review and building inspection resources for the purpose of expediting building approvals during the recovery period after the January 2025 wildfires. Use of the funds shall be restricted to expediting planning review and building inspections for rebuilding of residential properties still owned by the same homeowners on record as of January 7, 2025. Funds shall be allocated promptly to the local governments, with the allocation to the local governments determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development after conferring with local officials. Funds provided must supplement, not supplant, previously existing resources for planning review and building inspections. The funds described in this provision are available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028. SEC. 2. Item 7760-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 7760-001-0001—For support of Department of General Services ........................ 33,414,000 Schedule: (1) 6324046-Facilities Management Division ........................ 18,879,000 (2) 6325064-Project Management and Development Branch ........................ 550,000 (3) 6330073-Contracted Fiscal Services ........................ 8,218,000 (4) 6330082-Office of Sustainability ........................ 4,167,000 (4.5) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 250,000 (5) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 750,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 1,599,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −999,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (4), $2,500,000 shall be available for implementation of Chapter 368 of the Statutes of 2022 (SB 1203). 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $11,800,000 is for projects to upgrade direct digital control systems. This funding shall be limited to such projects at the (a) Ronald Reagan State Building; (b) Elihu M. Harris Building; (c) Governor Edmund G. “Pat” Brown Building; (d) Junipero Serra Office Building; (e) California Tower; (f) Mission Valley State Building; and (g) Van Nuys State Building. This funding shall be made available for these projects only after project plans specifications are completed and final project estimates are submitted to the Department of Finance. Should final project estimates total less than $11,800,000, the difference between these estimates and the amount made available pursuant to this provision shall revert to the General Fund. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $50,000 shall be available for a small associated monument in Capitol Park, to acknowledge the victims and survivors of California’s wildfires. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $500,000 shall be available for ventilation repair at the State’s central plant mushroom steam vent located on Capitol Mall, adjacent to the Employment Development Department headquarters building. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated in Schedule (4.5) is available for encumbrance through June 30, 2026, to provide assistance to the Los Angeles Unified School District, Pasadena Unified School District, and any impacted charter schools located within those school districts, to rebuild and recover school facilities damaged as a result of fires leading to any states of emergency declared by the Governor in January 2025. 6. The amount appropriated in Schedule (5) is available for encumbrance through June 30, 2026, to provide assistance to the Los Angeles Unified School District, Pasadena Unified School District, and any impacted charter schools located within those school districts, to rebuild and recover school facilities damaged as a result of fires leading to any states of emergency declared by the Governor in January 2025. 7. The Director of Finance may add schools or local educational agencies to the list of entities receiving assistance pursuant to Provisions 5 and 6 of this item. These additions shall not be effective sooner than 10 days following the transmittal of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee. SEC. 3. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 153, AB 155, AB 156, AB 159, AB 160, AB 161, AB 162, AB 163, AB 164, AB 165, AB 166, AB 167, AB 168, AB 169, AB 170, AB 171, AB 172, AB 173, AB 174, AB 175, AB 176, AB 177, AB 178, AB 179, AB 181, AB 182, AB 183, AB 184, AB 185, AB 218, SB 153, SB 155, SB 156, SB 159, SB 160, SB 161, SB 162, SB 163, SB 164, SB 165, SB 166, SB 167, SB 168, SB 169, SB 170, SB 171, SB 172, SB 173, SB 174, SB 175, SB 176, SB 177, SB 178, SB 179, SB 181, SB 182, SB 183, SB 184, SB 185, and SB 218 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, and AB 6, AB 7, SB 5, and SB 6 of the 2025–26 First Extraordinary Session. SEC. 4. Section 90.01 is added to the Budget Act of 2024, to read: SEC. 90.01. (a) The Director of Finance may increase the augmentation authority provided in subdivision (a) of Section 90.00 of this act by up to an additional $1,000,000,000. (b) Augmentations pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby appropriated for use by state departments and entities for uses consistent with the purposes of the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account concerning areas of the state affected by wildfire states of emergency that were declared by the Governor in January 2025. Those uses include, but are not limited to, emergency protective measures, evacuations, sheltering for survivors, household hazardous waste removal, assessment and remediation of post-fire hazards such as flash flooding and debris flows, traffic control, air quality and water and other environmental testing, and other actions to protect health, protect the safety of persons or property, and expedite recovery. (c) Increases in augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee. (d) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (e) (1) The Director of Finance’s authority to increase augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a) shall expire on April 30, 2025. (2) It is the intent of the Legislature to consider extending or amending the augmentation authority before that date, at which time the Legislature also intends to begin the process, following budget committee review, of appropriating bond funds from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, which was established by voter approval of Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, for wildfire and forest resilience activities. (f) Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until the applicable declarations of states of emergency in January 2025 are terminated or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. (g) The Department of Finance shall post on its internet website a Los Angeles Wildfire Response and Recovery Expenditure Report, including, to the extent feasible, summaries of the amounts and uses of funding spent by each department for the purposes described in subdivision (b). The report shall include funding provided under this section and Section 90.00, as well as other state funding concerning the response to and recovery from the January 2025 wildfires. This expenditure report shall be posted on or about February 7, 2025, and updated on or before February 28, 2025, March 31, 2025, and April 30, 2025. It is the intent of the Legislature to consider extending or amending these reporting requirements before April 30, 2025. (h) The executive and legislative branches jointly express their intent that departments receiving funding for January 2025 wildfire response and recovery shall continue to keep the Legislature informed pursuant to the reporting requirements in subdivision (g) and other means consistent with the comity of coequal branches of government. (i) The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the expenditures of funds augmented pursuant to this section and Section 90.00. (j) The executive branch shall seek reimbursements from the federal government for the maximum possible amount of funds related to response and recovery from the January 2025 wildfires. SEC. 5. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Savings 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 5.26 Legal Services Grant Funding 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.93 Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account Reconciliation Adjustments 11.95 Federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 Home and Community-Based Services Funding 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of Consumer Affairs 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 15.80 Reparations Legislation Funding 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision, and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 90.00 Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 90.01 Additional Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 6. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.